Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-818
Paunch manure, rendering, or sewage plant; refuse area; establish; residential area; restriction.

After July 19, 1980, no person shall establish a paunch manure, rendering, or sewage treatment plant or facility, or an area where refuse, garbage, or rubbish is disposed of within three thousand three hundred feet of a residential area in a city of the metropolitan class. For purposes of this section, residential area means an area designated as residential under the zoning ordinances of such city.

Laws 1980, LB 853, § 15;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 238.